New York, session 2025-2026, S6745.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 359 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. The trustees of the state university of New York shall require, on 4 or before November first of each year, an annual report of the research 5 foundation of the state university of New York, and an annual report of 6 state-operated institutions' and community colleges' campus foundations 7 and their subsidiaries, in a standardized format developed by the chan- 8 cellor. The annual reports required by this subdivision shall be posted 9 publicly on the website of the state university of New York in a machine 10 readable format by November first of each year. The reports shall 11 include, but not be limited to: 12 a. financial reports, including: audited financials in accordance with 13 all applicable regulations and following generally accepted accounting 14 principles as defined in subdivision ten of section two of the state 15 finance law, and any long-term liabilities; 16 b. a list of all contracts, including amount, purpose and identifying 17 vendor information of each contract; and 18 c. a list of all foundation and state university employees by campus, 19 department and job location, and the amount spent by campus, department 20 and job location which shall include annual employee salaries or other 21 compensation, employee job titles and descriptions and employee bene- 22 fits. 23 § 2. Section 6233 of the education law is amended by adding a new 24 subdivision 4 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09856-01-5 S. 6745 2 1 4. The trustees of the city university of New York shall require, on 2 or before November first of each year, an annual report of the research 3 foundation of the city university of New York, and an annual report of 4 senior colleges' and community colleges' campus foundations and their 5 subsidiaries, in a standardized format developed by the chancellor. The 6 annual reports required by this subdivision shall be posted publicly on 7 the website of the city university of New York in a machine readable 8 format, by November first of each year. The reports shall include, but 9 not be limited to: 10 a. financial reports, including: audited financials in accordance with 11 all applicable regulations and following generally accepted accounting 12 principles as defined in subdivision ten of section two of the state 13 finance law, and any long-term liabilities; 14 b. a list of all contracts, including amount, purpose and identifying 15 vendor information of each contract; and 16 c. a list of all foundation and state university employees by campus, 17 department and job location, and the amount spent by campus, department 18 and job location which shall include annual employee salaries or other 19 compensation, employee job titles and descriptions and employee bene- 20 fits. 21 § 3. The reports required in sections one and two of this act may not 22 disclose the following information that: (a) is specifically exempted 23 from disclosure by state or federal statute; (b) if disclosed would 24 constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the 25 provisions of subdivision 2 of section 89 of the public officers law; 26 (c) if disclosed would impair present or imminent contract awards or 27 collective bargaining negotiations; (d) are trade secrets or are submit- 28 ted to an entity by a commercial enterprise or derived from information 29 obtained from a commercial enterprise and which if disclosed would cause 30 substantial injury to the competitive position of the subject enter- 31 prise; (e) are records of an entity relating to charitable donors or 32 prospective donors, including but not limited to the fund-raising strat- 33 egies of agencies identified in subdivision 3 of section 86 of the 34 public officers law, provided that records relating to fund-raising 35 strategies would, if disclosed, impair the ability of those entities to 36 attract or gain donations, and provided further that the name of any 37 donor and the amount of donation made by such donor shall be subject to 38 disclosure if such donor, or any entity in which such donor has a 39 substantial interest, seeks to transact business, or does transact busi- 40 ness, with the entity to which the donation is made within three years 41 of the date of such donation; and (f) are academic or scientific 42 research or research-related records, including any draft, preliminary 43 or unfunded grant or contract document, whether sponsored by the entity 44 itself or in conjunction with a third party, or records relating to the 45 entity's intellectual property, which, if disclosed, would adversely 46 affect license, patent, copyright or other rights of the entity. This 47 section shall not permit an entity to withhold records or portions ther- 48 eof pertaining to the name, title, expenditure, source or amount of 49 public funding relating to such research or intellectual property. 50 § 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede the 51 provisions of chapter 10 of the laws of 2006. 52 § 5. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 53 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 54 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 55 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 56 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.